Hawaii statutes.
§342L-13 Appeal. If any party is
aggrieved by an order of the director, the party may appeal in the manner
provided in chapter 91 to the circuit environmental court of the circuit in
which the party resides or has the party’s principal place of business or in
which the action in question occurred; provided that the operation of an order
shall not be stayed on appeal unless specifically ordered by [an] environmental
court of competent jurisdiction. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §6; am L 1992, c 259,
§15; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next